Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2527.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "eligible student" in section 1511-D of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1511-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Eligible student." A child who [is at least three years of age and is younger than the entry age of kindergarten in the school district of residence.] meets all of the following 12345678910111213141516171819 requirements:(1) Is at least three years of age and is younger than the entry age of kindergarten in the school district of residence.(2) Resides in a household with an annual household income that is not greater than 400% of the Federal poverty level.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2527PN3426 - 2 - 123456789